Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5069.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7132. (1) Beginning January 1, 2029, a person shall not sell or offer for sale a food that contains any of the following: (a) Brominated vegetable oil. (b) Propylparaben. (c) Any of the following dyes: (i) Red 40. (ii) Green 3. (iii) Blue 1. (iv) Blue 2. (v) Yellow 6. (2) This section does not apply if the federal government bans the substances listed under subsection (1) on or before January 1, 2029.